Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB672.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 42.722 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 42.720 to 42.742:
(1) "Artificial intelligence" means a set of technologies that enables machines to
perform tasks under varying and unpredictable circumstances that typically
require human intelligence or oversight, or that can learn from experience and
improve performance;
(2) "Artificial intelligence system" means a machine-based computing system that:
(a) Is built upon algorithms that can operate under varying circumstances
autonomously without human intervention;
(b) Is built on technology designed to simulate human intelligence;
(c) Operates by making observations about environments or data to make
predictions and decisions that affect real or virtual environments; and
(d) Is capable of learning from its experiences and improving its capabilities;
(3) "Communications" or "telecommunications" means any transmission, emission, or
reception of signs, signals, writings, images, and sounds of intelligence of any
nature by wire, radio, optical, or other electromagnetic systems, and includes all
facilities and equipment performing these functions;
(4) "Consequential decision" means any decision that has a material, significant, or
legal effect on providing or denying services, cost, or terms to any citizen or
business;
(5) "Deployer" means any department, agency, and administrative body that deploys
or uses a high-risk artificial intelligence system;
(6) "Developer" means any department, agency, or administrative body that develops
or intentionally and substantially modifies a high-risk artificial intelligence
system that is offered, purchased, sold, leased, given, or otherwise provided to
Page 1 of 24
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1157
citizens and businesses in the Commonwealth;
(7) "External artificial intelligence system" means artificial intelligence systems that
are used to:
(a) Analyze data about individual citizens or businesses within the
Commonwealth;
(b) Make decisions relating to such individual citizens or businesses; or
(c) Produce outputs directly accessible by such individual citizens or
businesses;
(8) "Foundation model" means a machine learning model that is trained on broad
data at scale, designed for generality of output, and can be adapted to a wide
range of distinctive tasks;
(9) "General-purpose artificial model" means any form of artificial intelligence
system that displays significant generality, is capable of performing a wide range
of distinct tasks, and can be integrated into a variety of subsequent applications
or systems;
(10) "Generative artificial intelligence system" means any artificial intelligence
system or service that incorporates generative artificial intelligence;
(11)[(2)] "Geographic information system" or "GIS" means a computerized database
management system for the capture, storage, retrieval, analysis, and display of
spatial or locationally defined data;
(12) (a) "High-risk artificial intelligence system" means any artificial intelligence
system that is a substantial factor in the decision-making process or
specifically intended to autonomously make a consequential decision.
(b) "High-risk artificial intelligence system" does not include a system or
service intended to perform a procedural task, improve the result of a
completed human activity, or detect decision-making patterns or deviations
from previous decision-making patterns and is not meant to replace or
Page 2 of 24
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1157
influence human assessment without human review, or perform a
preparatory task in an assessment relevant to a consequential decision;
(13)[(3)] "Information resources" means the procedures, equipment, and software that
are designed, built, operated, and maintained to collect, record, process, store,
retrieve, display, and transmit information, and associated personnel;
(14)[(4)] "Information technology" means data processing and telecommunications
hardware, software, services, supplies, facilities, maintenance, and training that are
used to support information processing and telecommunications systems to include
geographic information systems;
(15) "Internal artificial intelligence system" means artificial intelligence systems that
are only used internally by departments, agencies, and administrative bodies to
increase efficiency, streamline internal processes, or otherwise improve the way
such organizations function internally;
(16) "Machine learning" means the development of algorithms to build data-derived
statistical models that are capable of drawing inferences from previously unseen
data without explicit human instruction;
(17)[(5)] "Personal information" has the same meaning as in KRS 61.931;
(18)[(6)] "Project" means a program to provide information technologies support to
functions within an executive branch state agency, which should be characterized
by well-defined parameters, specific objectives, common benefits, planned
activities, expected outcomes and completion dates, and an established budget with
a specified source of funding;
(19)[(7)] "Security breach" has the same meaning as in KRS 61.931; and
(20)[(8)] "Technology infrastructure" means any computing equipment, servers,
networks, storage, desktop support, telephony, enterprise shared systems,
information technology security, disaster recovery, business continuity, database
administration, and software licensing.
Page 3 of 24
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1157
Section 2. KRS 42.726 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Commonwealth Office of Technology shall be the lead organizational entity
within the executive branch regarding delivery of information technology services,
including application development and delivery, and shall serve as the single
information technology authority for the Commonwealth.
(2) The roles and duties of the Commonwealth Office of Technology shall include but
not be limited to:
(a) Providing technical support and services to all executive agencies of state
government in the application of information technology;
(b) Assuring compatibility and connectivity of Kentucky's information systems;
(c) Developing strategies and policies to support and promote the effective
applications of information technology within state government as a means of
saving money, increasing employee productivity, and improving state services
to the public, including electronic public access to information of the
Commonwealth;
(d) Developing, implementing, and managing strategic information technology
directions, standards, and enterprise architecture, including implementing
necessary management processes to ensure full compliance with those
directions, standards, and architecture;
(e) Promoting effective and efficient design and operation of all major
information resources management processes for executive branch agencies,
including improvements to work processes;
(f) Developing, implementing, and maintaining the technology infrastructure of
the Commonwealth and all related support staff, planning, administration,
asset management, and procurement for all executive branch cabinets and
agencies except:
1. Agencies led by a statewide elected official;
Page 4 of 24
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1157
2. The nine (9) public institutions of postsecondary education;
3. The Department of Education's services provided to local school
districts;
4. The Kentucky Retirement Systems, the County Employees Retirement
System, the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority, and the Teachers'
Retirement System;
5. The Kentucky Housing Corporation;
6. The Kentucky Lottery Corporation;
7. The Kentucky Higher Education Student Loan Corporation; and
8. The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;
(g) Facilitating and fostering applied research in emerging technologies that offer
the Commonwealth innovative business solutions;
(h) Reviewing and overseeing large or complex information technology projects
and systems for compliance with statewide strategies, policies, and standards,
including alignment with the Commonwealth's business goals, investment,
and other risk management policies. The executive director is authorized to
grant or withhold approval to initiate these projects;
(i) Integrating information technology resources to provide effective and
supportable information technology applications in the Commonwealth;
(j) Establishing the central statewide geographic information clearinghouse to
maintain map inventories, information on current and planned geographic
information systems applications, information on grants available for the
acquisition or enhancement of geographic information resources, and a
directory of geographic information resources available within the state or
from the federal government;
(k) Coordinating multiagency information technology projects, including
overseeing the development and maintenance of statewide base maps and
Page 5 of 24
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1157
geographic information systems;
(l) Providing access to both consulting and technical assistance, and education
and training, on the application and use of information technologies to state
and local agencies;
(m) In cooperation with other agencies, evaluating, participating in pilot studies,
and making recommendations on information technology hardware and
software;
(n) Providing staff support and technical assistance to the Geographic
Information Advisory Council and the Kentucky Information Technology
Advisory Council;
(o) Overseeing the development of a statewide geographic information plan with
input from the Geographic Information Advisory Council;
(p) Developing for state executive branch agencies a coordinated security
framework and model governance structure relating to the privacy and
confidentiality of personal information collected and stored by state executive
branch agencies, including but not limited to:
1. Identification of key infrastructure components and how to secure them;
2. Establishment of a common benchmark that measures the effectiveness
of security, including continuous monitoring and automation of
defenses;
3. Implementation of vulnerability scanning and other security
assessments;
4. Provision of training, orientation programs, and other communications
that increase awareness of the importance of security among agency
employees responsible for personal information; and
5. Development of and making available a cyber security incident response
plan and procedure;[ and]
Page 6 of 24
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1157
(q) Establishing, publishing, maintaining and implementing comprehensive
policy standards and procedures for the responsible, ethical, and
transparent use of generative artificial intelligence systems and high-risk
artificial intelligence systems, including but not limited to policy standards
and procedures that:
1. Govern their procurement, implementation, and ongoing assessment;
2. Address and provide resources for security of data and privacy; and
3. Create guidelines for acceptable use policies for integrating high-risk
artificial intelligence systems; and
(r) Preparing proposed legislation and funding proposals for the General
Assembly that will further solidify coordination and expedite implementation
of information technology systems.
(3) The Commonwealth Office of Technology may:
(a) Provide general consulting services, technical training, and support for
generic software applications, upon request from a local government, if the
executive director finds that the requested services can be rendered within the
established terms of the federally approved cost allocation plan;
(b) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
necessary for the implementation of KRS 42.720 to 42.742, 45.253, 171.420,
186A.040, and 186A.285;
(c) Solicit, receive, and consider proposals from any state agency, federal agency,
local government, university, nonprofit organization, private person, or
corporation;
(d) Solicit and accept money by grant, gift, donation, bequest, legislative
appropriation, or other conveyance to be held, used, and applied in accordance
with KRS 42.720 to 42.742, 45.253, 171.420, 186A.040, and 186A.285;
(e) Make and enter into memoranda of agreement and contracts necessary or
Page 7 of 24
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1157
incidental to the performance of duties and execution of its powers, including
but not limited to agreements or contracts with the United States, other state
agencies, and any governmental subdivision of the Commonwealth;
(f) Accept grants from the United States government and its agencies and
instrumentalities, and from any source, other than any person, firm, or
corporation, or any director, officer, or agent thereof that manufactures or
sells information resources technology equipment, goods, or services. To
these ends, the Commonwealth Office of Technology shall have the power to
comply with those conditions and execute those agreements that are
necessary, convenient, or desirable; and
(g) Purchase interest in contractual services, rentals of all types, supplies,
materials, equipment, and other services to be used in the research and
development of beneficial applications of information resources technologies.
Competitive bids may not be required for:
1. New and emerging technologies as approved by the executive director
or her or his designee; or
2. Related professional, technical, or scientific services, but contracts shall
be submitted in accordance with KRS 45A.690 to 45A.725.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter or diminish the provisions of KRS
171.410 to 171.740 or the authority conveyed by these statutes to the Archives and
Records Commission and the Department for Libraries and Archives.
(5) The Commonwealth Office of Technology shall, on or before October 1 of each
year, submit to the Legislative Research Commission a report in accordance with
KRS 57.390 detailing:
(a) Any security breaches that occurred within organizational units of the
executive branch of state government during the prior fiscal year that required
notification to the Commonwealth Office of Technology under KRS 61.932;
Page 8 of 24
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1157
(b) Actions taken to resolve the security breach, and to prevent additional security
breaches in the future;
(c) A general description of what actions are taken as a matter of course to protect
personal data from security breaches; and
(d) Any quantifiable financial impact to the agency reporting a security breach.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 42.720 TO 42.742 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Commonwealth Office of Technology shall create an Artificial Intelligence
Governance Committee to:
(a) Develop policy standards and guiding principles to mitigate risks and
protect data and privacy of Kentucky citizens and businesses that adhere to
the latest version of Standard ISO/IEC 42001 of the International
Organization for Standardization;
(b) Establish technology standards to provide protocols and requirements for
the use of generative artificial intelligence and high-risk artificial
intelligence systems;
(c) Ensure transparency in the use of artificial intelligence systems;
(d) Maintain a centralized registry to include current inventory of generative
artificial intelligence systems and high-risk artificial intelligence systems;
and
(e) Develop an approval process to include a registry of application, use case,
and decision rationale.
(2) The Artificial Intelligence Governance Committee shall develop policies and
procedures to ensure that any department, program, cabinet, agency, or
administrative body that utilizes and accesses the Commonwealth's information
technology and technology infrastructure shall:
(a) Verify the use and development of generative artificial intelligence systems
Page 9 of 24
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1157
and high-risk artificial intelligence systems, and that any information
utilized or produced is trusted, safe, and secure; and
(b) Act in compliance with responsible, ethical, and transparent procedures to
implement the use of artificial intelligence technologies by:
1. Ensuring artificial intelligence models have comprehensive and
complete documentation that is available for review and inspection;
2. Requiring validation by humans for bias, unintended consequences,
and correctness for all outcomes from generative and high-risk
artificial intelligence systems;
3. Ensuring the use of generative artificial intelligence and high-risk
artificial intelligence systems are resilient, accountable, and
explainable; and
4. Prohibiting the use of unexplainable artificial intelligence capabilities
in any decision-making or approval or denial processes in state
government functions.
(3) The Commonwealth Office of Technology shall prioritize personal privacy and
the protection of the data of individuals and businesses as the state develops,
implements, employs, and procures artificial intelligence systems, generative
artificial intelligence systems, and high-risk artificial intelligence systems by
ensuring all departments, agencies, and administrative bodies:
(a) Allow only the use of necessary data in artificial intelligence systems;
(b) Do not allow unrestricted access to personal data controlled by the
Commonwealth; and
(c) Secure all data and implement a timeframe for data retention.
(4) To maintain and secure the technology infrastructure, information technology,
information resources, and personal information, all departments, agencies, and
administrative bodies shall be subject to the centralized approval process in
Page 10 of 24
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1157
subsection (5) of this section for both the internal and external utilization of
generative artificial intelligence systems or high-risk artificial intelligence
systems.
(5) (a) The Commonwealth Office of Technology shall ensure the implementation
of generative artificial intelligence and high-risk artificial intelligence in
agency use and business processes is only considered if there is a positive
outcome for citizens. A department, agency, or administrative body shall:
1. Demonstrate that the use of artificial intelligence is the best solution to
yield the intended outcome by examining other technology and process
applications available prior to employing the capabilities of artificial
intelligence; and
2. Provide a statement of intent for each use case of the artificial
intelligence application, and indicate whether the outcome of artificial
intelligence will make a recommendation to the user or make a
determination on behalf of the user.
(b) When a department, agency, or administrative body seeks approval to
develop, implement, employ, or procure any internal or external artificial
intelligence systems, the request shall:
1. Be entered into a registry maintained by the Commonwealth Office of
Technology; and
2. Include the planned artificial intelligence use case and any necessary
documentation.
(c) The executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology shall:
1. Review and approve or disapprove each request for use of artificial
intelligence; and
2. Retain records of the specific artificial intelligence use and decision
rationale for an approval or disapproval.
Page 11 of 24
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1157
(d) At a minimum, the executive director of the Commonwealth Office of
Technology shall consider and document:
1. Whether the artificial intelligence system is fair and will not result in
discrimination against any individual or group of individuals;
2. How the use of generative artificial intelligence or other artificial
intelligence capabilities will benefit the citizens of the Commonwealth
and serve the objectives of the department or agency;
3. Whether adequate oversight and human interaction of the artificial
intelligence system exists;
4. The potential risks, including cybersecurity, data protection and
privacy, and health and safety of individuals and businesses, and a
mitigation strategy to any identified or potential risk; and
5. The proper control and management for all data possessed by the
Commonwealth to maintain security and data quality.
(6) (a) A department, agency, or administrative body shall disclose to the public,
through a clear and conspicuous disclaimer, when generative artificial
intelligence, artificial intelligence systems, or other artificial intelligence-
related capabilities are used:
1. To render any decision regarding individual citizens or businesses
within the state;
2. In any process, or to produce materials used by the system or humans,
to inform a decision or create an output; or
3. To produce information or outputs accessible by citizens and
businesses.
(b) When an artificial intelligence system makes external decisions related to
citizens of the Commonwealth, a department, agency, or administrative
body shall:
Page 12 of 24
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1157
1. Disclose how artificial intelligence is used in the decision-making
process;
2. Provide the extent of human involvement in validating and oversight
of any decision made; and
3. Make readily available options for individuals to appeal a
consequential decision that involves artificial intelligence.
(c) Any disclaimer under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall also provide
information regarding third-party artificial intelligence products or
programs, including but not limited to:
1. Data sets used;
2. Data and time parameters in the data set;
3. Description of biases embedded in the program; and
4. Any warranties provided by the owner of the artificial intelligence
program and subsequent data outputs.
(7) All departments, agencies, and administrative bodies shall submit for review all
third-party high-risk artificial intelligence developers, system administrators,
providers, and contractors by the Commonwealth Office of Technology in order
to mitigate the risk of data breaches, unauthorized access, or misuse of personal
information. The review process shall include but is not limited to:
(a) Assessing the ability to deliver value to the citizens of the Commonwealth
and evaluate their trust, safety, and security procedures;
(b) Ensuring utilization of the Commonwealth's data collection and utilization
standards, comply with any applicable laws, policies, and administrative
regulations, and adhere to the latest version of Standard ISO/IEC 42001 of
the International Organization for Standardization;
(c) Reviewing the results of testing conducted by the developer to verify the
efficacy of the generative artificial intelligence or high-risk artificial
Page 13 of 24
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1157
intelligence systems, including but not limited to:
1. The cybersecurity and physical security;
2. The potential risks associated; and
3. Any of the potential biases that could result in unlawful
discrimination;
(d) Assessing the audit reports, product roadmaps, warranties, terms of service,
end-user license agreements, contracts, and any other documentation in the
assessment of risk management activities; and
(e) Implementing and maintaining a comprehensive inventory of all third-party
material used or required for the use of all third-party generative artificial
intelligence or other artificial intelligence related capabilities;
(8) The Commonwealth Office of Technology shall establish policies to encompass
legal and ethical frameworks to ensure that any artificial intelligence systems
shall align with existing laws, administrative regulations, and guidelines, which
shall be updated at least annually to maintain compliance as technology and
industry best practices evolve.
(9) Operating standards for utilization of high-risk artificial intelligence systems
shall:
(a) Prohibit the use of a high-risk artificial intelligence system to render a
consequential decision without the design and implementation of a risk
management policy and program for high-risk artificial intelligence
systems. The risk management policy shall;
1. Specify principles, process, and personnel that shall be utilized to
maintain the risk management program; and
2. Identify, mitigate, and document any bias or potential bias that is a
potential consequence of use in making a consequential decision; and
(b) Each risk management policy designed and implemented shall at a
Page 14 of 24
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1157
minimum adhere to the latest version of Standard ISO/IEC 42001 of the
International Organization for Standardization, or another national or
internationally recognized risk management framework for artificial
intelligence systems, and consider:
1. The size and complexity of the deployer;
2. Nature and scope and intended use of the high-risk artificial
intelligence system and is deployer; and
3. The sensitivity and volume of data processed.
(10) (a) The use of a high-risk artificial intelligence system shall not be used to
make a consequential decision without a completed impact assessment that
shall be completed before initial use and no later than ninety (90) days after
each significant update.
(b) Each impact assessment for a high-risk artificial intelligence system shall
include but not be limited to:
1. A statement disclosing the purpose, intended use case, and benefits;
2. Identify if the use creates a potential risk and measures to prevent bias
or unlawful discrimination;
3. A statement that any post-deployment assessments for significant
updates are consistent with or vary from the agency's intended use;
4. A description of categories of the process inputs and outputs,
including any description of data categories used for customization;
5. A list of any metrics for performance evaluation and known
limitations;
6. A description of transparency measures; and
7. A description of monitoring, user safeguards, and any oversight
processes to addresses issues from the implementation or use of a
high-risk artificial intelligence system.
Page 15 of 24
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1157
(11) The Commonwealth Office of Technology shall provide education and training of
employees about the benefits and risks of artificial intelligence and allowable use
policies.
(12) (a) The Commonwealth Office of Technology shall transmit reports to the
Legislative Research Committee and the Interim Joint Committee on State
Government by December 1, 2025, and annually every year thereafter. The
reports shall include:
1. The artificial intelligence registry in subsection (5)(b)1. of this section,
which shall include the current inventory of artificial intelligence
utilized in state government;
2. Applications received for use of artificial intelligence, including the
decision and rationale in approving or disapproving a request in
compliance with subsection (5)(c) of this section; and
3. Third-party artificial intelligence developers, system administrators,
providers, and contractors submitted for review in compliance with
subsection (5) of this section.
(b) To facilitate the report in paragraph (a) of this subsection the
Commonwealth Office of Technology shall receive from each department,
agency, and administrative body a report examining and identifying
potential use cases for the deployment of generative artificial intelligence
systems and high-risk artificial intelligence systems, including a description
of the benefits and risks to individuals, communities, government and
government, employees.
(13) The Commonwealth Office of Technology shall promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section and
Section 2 of this Act by July 1, 2025.
Section 4. KRS 117.001 is amended to read as follows:
Page 16 of 24
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1157
As used in this chapter[, unless the context otherwise requires]:
(1) "Audit log" means a detailed record of all actions and events that have occurred on
the voting system, including:
(a) Log-in attempts with username and time stamp;
(b) Election definition and setup;
(c) Ballot preparation and results processing;
(d) Diagnostics of any type; and
(e) Error and warning messages and operator response;
(2) "Automatic tabulating equipment" means apparatus necessary to automatically
examine and count votes as designated on ballots and data processing machines
which can be used for counting ballots and tabulating results;
(3) "Ballot" or "official ballot" means the official presentation of offices and candidates
to be voted for, including write-in candidates, and all public questions submitted for
determination, and shall include a voting machine ballot, a paper ballot, an absentee
ballot, a federal provisional ballot, a federal provisional absentee ballot, or a
supplemental paper ballot which has been authorized for the use of voters in any
primary, regular election, or special election by the Secretary of State or the county
clerk;
(4) "Ballot box" means any box, bag, or other container that can be locked, sealed, or
otherwise rendered tamper-resistant, for receiving ballots;
(5) "Ballot marking device" means any approved device for marking a ballot which
will enable the ballot to be tabulated manually or by means of automatic tabulating
equipment;
(6) "Election" or "elections" means any primary, regular election, or special election;
(7) "Election officer" has the same meaning as in KRS 118.015;
(8) (a) "Electioneering communication" means any communication broadcast by
cable, internet, television, or radio, printed in a newspaper or on a billboard,
Page 17 of 24
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1157
directly mailed or delivered by hand to personal residences, or in telephone
calls made to personal residences, otherwise distributed that:
1. Unambiguously refers to any candidate for any state, county, city, or
district office, or to any ballot measure;
2. Occurs within forty-five (45) days before a primary or general
election; and
3. Is received by an audience that includes members of the electorate for
such public office or the electorate associated with the ballot
containing the ballot measure.
(b) "Electioneering communication" does not include:
1. Any news articles, editorial endorsements, opinions or commentary,
writings, or letters to the editor printed in a newspaper, magazine, or
other periodical not owned or controlled by a candidate, committee, or
political party;
2. Any editorial endorsements or opinions aired by a broadcast facility
not owned or controlled by a candidate, committee, or political party;
3. Any communication by persons made in the regular course and scope
of their business or any communication made by a membership
organization solely to members of such an organization and their
families;
4. Any communication that refers to any candidate only as part of the
popular name of a bill or statute; or
5. A communication that constitutes a contribution or independent
expenditure as defined in KRS 121.015;
(9) "E-poll book" means an electronic device capable of holding a file of voter data and
related information for use in identifying registered voters prior to a voter's
receiving or casting a ballot, and allowing a voter to electronically sign in on an
Page 18 of 24
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1157
electronic registered voter roster in lieu of signing a paper registered voter roster;
(10)[(9)] "Federal provisional voter" means a person:
(a) Who does not appear to be registered to vote;
(b) Whose name does not appear on the precinct roster;
(c) Who has not provided proof of identification to the precinct election officer
before voting in a federal election; and
(d) Who elects to proceed with voting a federal provisional ballot under KRS
117.229;
(11)[(10)] "Federal provisional ballot" or "federal provisional absentee ballot" means
ballots which have been authorized by the Secretary of State or the county clerk to
be used by federal provisional voters in any federal primary or election;
(12)[(11)] "Information content provider" means any person or entity that is
responsible, in whole or in part, for the creation or development of information
provided through the internet or any other interactive computer service;
(13) "Inner envelope" or "secrecy envelope" means the envelope provided to the voter
with a ballot into which the voter shall place his or her voted ballot;
(14) "Interactive computer service" means any information service, system, or access
software provider that provides or enables computer access by multiple users to a
computer server, including specifically a service or system that provides access to
the internet and such services offered or systems operated by libraries or
educational institutions;
(15)[(12)] "Political group" has the same meaning as in KRS 118.015;
(16)[(13)] "Political organization" has the same meaning as in KRS 118.015;
(17)[(14)] "Precinct ballot counter" means an automatic tabulating device used at the
precinct to tabulate and process ballots;
(18)[(15)] "Proof of identification" means a document that was issued by:
(a) The United States or the Commonwealth of Kentucky, and the document
Page 19 of 24
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1157
contains:
1. The name of the individual to whom the document was issued; and
2. A photograph of the individual to whom the document was issued;
(b) The United States Department of Defense, a branch of the uniformed services,
the Merchant Marine, or the Kentucky National Guard, and the document
contains:
1. The name of the individual to whom the document was issued; and
2. A photograph of the individual to whom the document was issued;
(c) A public or private college, university, or postgraduate technical or
professional school located within the United States, and the document
contains:
1. The name of the individual to whom the document was issued; and
2. A photograph of the individual to whom the document was issued; or
(d) Any city government, county government, urban-county government, charter
county government, consolidated local government, or unified local
government, which is located within this state, and the document contains:
1. The name of the individual to whom the document was issued; and
2. A photograph of the individual to whom the document was issued;
(19) "Sponsor" means the person or entity paying for the electioneering
communication. If a person or entity acts as an agent for another or is
reimbursed by another for the payment, the original source of the payment is the
sponsor;
(20) (a) 1. "Synthetic media" means an image, audio recording, or video
recording of an identifiable natural individual's appearance, action,
or speech that has been intentionally manipulated with the use of
generative adversarial network techniques or other digital technology
in a manner to create a realistic but false image, audio, or video that
Page 20 of 24
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1157
produces:
a. A depiction that, to a reasonable individual, is of an identifiable
natural individual in appearance, action, or speech that did not
actually occur in reality and that was created without the consent
of such individual; and
b. A fundamentally different understanding or impression of the
appearance, action, or speech than a reasonable person would
have from the unaltered, original version of the image, audio
recording, or video recording.
2. As used in this subparagraph:
a. "Generative adversarial network" means a machine learning
model that uses neural networks to develop new data and make
more accurate predictions; and
b. "Neural network" means a machine learning algorithm modeled
on the human brain and nervous system.
(b) "Synthetic media" does not include content that contains a disclosure
under subsection (2) of Section 5 of this Act.
(21)[(16)] "Voting booth" or "ballot completion area" means an area in which a voter
casts his or her vote or completes his or her ballot which is designed to ensure the
secrecy of the vote;
(22)[(17)] "Vote center" means a consolidated precinct of the county;
(23)[(18)] "Voting equipment" means any physical component of a voting system and
includes voting machines where voting machines are in operation;
(24)[(19)] "Voting machine" or "machine":
(a) Means a part of a voting system that consists of one (1) or more electronic
devices that operate independently or as a combination of a ballot marking
device and an electronic or automatic vote tabulation device; and
Page 21 of 24
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1157
(b) Does not include an e-poll book;
(25)[(20)] "Voting system":
(a) Means the total combination of physical, mechanical, electromechanical, or
electronic equipment, including the software, hardware, firmware, and
documentation required to program, control, and support that equipment, that
is used to:
1. Define ballots;
2. Cast and count votes;
3. Report or display election results; and
4. Maintain and produce any audit trail information;
(b) Includes the practices and associated documentation used to:
1. Identify system components and versions of those components;
2. Test the system during its development and maintenance;
3. Maintain records of system errors and defects;
4. Determine specific system changes to be made to a system after the
initial qualification of the system;
5. Make available any materials to the voter, such as notices, instructions,
forms, or paper ballots; and
(c) Does not include an e-poll book; and
(26)[(21)] "Voter-verified paper audit trail" means a contemporaneous paper record of a
ballot printed for the voter to confirm his or her votes before the voter casts his or
her ballot that:
(a) Allows the voter to verify the voter's ballot choices before the casting of the
voter's ballot;
(b) Is not retained by the voter;
(c) Does not contain individual voter information;
(d) Is produced on paper that is sturdy, clean, and resistant to degradation; and
Page 22 of 24
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1157
(e) Is readable in a manner that makes the voter's ballot choices obvious to the
voter or any person without the use of computer or electronic code.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 117 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any election officer or candidate for any elected office whose appearance, action,
or speech is altered through the use of synthetic media in an electioneering
communication may:
(a) Seek injunctive or other equitable relief against the sponsor of the
electioneering communication prohibiting the publication of that synthetic
media; and
(b) Bring an action for damages against the sponsor of the electioneering
communication. The court may also award a prevailing party reasonable
attorney's fees and costs. This paragraph does not limit or preclude a
plaintiff from securing or recovering any other available remedy.
(2) It is an affirmative defense for any action brought under subsection (1) of this
section that the electioneering communication containing synthetic media
includes a disclosure that is clear and conspicuous and included in, or alongside
and associated with, the content in a manner that is likely to be noticed by the
user.
(3) Any action brought under subsection (1) of this section shall be filed in the
Circuit Court of the county in which the plaintiff resides.
(4) In any action brought under subsection (1) of this section, the plaintiff bears the
burden of establishing the use of synthetic media by clear and convincing
evidence.
(5) In any action brought under subsection (1) of this section:
(a) The sponsor of the electioneering communication may be held liable; and
(b) The medium disseminating the electioneering communication and the
Page 23 of 24
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1157
advertising sales representative of such medium shall not be held liable,
except as provided in subsection (6) of this section.
(6) Except when a licensee, programmer, or operator of a federally licensed
broadcasting station transmits an electioneering communication that is subject to
47 U.S.C. sec. 315, a medium or its advertising sales representative may be held
liable in a cause of action brought under subsection (1) of this section if:
(a) The person intentionally removes any disclosure described in subsection (2)
of this section from the electioneering communication it disseminates and
does not remove the electioneering communication or replace the disclosure
when notified; or
(b) Subject to affirmative defenses described in subsection (2) of this section,
the person changes the content of an electioneering communication in a
manner that results in it qualifying as synthetic media.
(7) (a) A provider or user of an interactive computer service shall not be treated as
the publisher or speaker of any information provided by another
information content provider.
(b) An interactive computer service may be held liable in accordance with
subsection (6) of this section.
(8) Courts are encouraged to determine matters under this section expediently.
Section 6. Whereas implementing governance to maximize the opportunities for
the responsible and ethical use of artificial intelligence is vitally important to combat the
critical impact artificial intelligence can have on the security of data and information in
the Commonwealth and it is critically important to protect candidates and election
officers from fraudulent misrepresentations of themselves and their issues, an emergency
is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the
Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 24 of 24
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed